Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-307
Rules and regulations.

The department, upon the joint recommendation of the Board of Pharmacy, Board of Optometry, and Board of Medicine and Surgery, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for enforcement of the Mail Order Contact Lens Act.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 92.